Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.230

Referral of evidence to attorney general or prosecuting attorney.

The director may refer such evidence as may be available concerning violations of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder to the attorney general or the proper prosecuting attorney who may in his or her discretion with or without such a reference institute the appropriate criminal proceeding under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 564; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 23.]